Illinois, session 104th, SB3682.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Veterans Affairs Act is 5amended by adding Section 45 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2805/45 new)7    Sec. 45. Task Force on Federal Impact to Illinois 8Veterans.9    (a) The Task Force on Federal Impact to Illinois Veterans 10is created within the Department of Veterans Affairs. The 11purpose of the Task Force is to include the feedback, 12experiences, and guidance from veterans throughout Illinois on 13the state of existing veteran programming, resources, housing, 14and healthcare, as well as analyze the current state of staff 15and funding changes to the U.S. Department of Veterans' 16Affairs, in conjunction with the impact federal funding cuts 17to social services enacted by the Department of Government 18Efficiency and through the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, Public 19Law 119-21, have on the over 500,000 veterans living in 20Illinois.21    Additionally, the Task Force shall assess ways that the 22State of Illinois can assist Illinois veterans expected to 23lose their jobs within the U.S. Department of Veterans'   SB3682- 2 -LRB104 20152 KTG 33603 b1Affairs, as well as veterans impacted by cuts to entitlement 2programs, including, but not limited to, SNAP, Medicaid, and 3federal tax credits.4    (b) The Task Force shall have 12 members, comprised as 5follows:6        (1) the Director of Veterans Affairs;7        (2) the Chairperson of the Senate Veterans Affairs 8    Committee or his or her designee;9        (3) the Chairperson of the House Veterans' Affairs 10    Committee or his or her designee;11        (4) 3 representatives from a variety of veterans 12    organizations, appointed by the Director of Veterans 13    Affairs; and14        (5) 6 veterans representing the geographic diversity 15    in the State, appointed by the Director of Veterans 16    Affairs.17    (c) Task Force members shall serve without compensation.18    (d) The Task Force shall meet initially at the call of the 19Director of Veterans Affairs. The Director or the Director's 20designee shall serve as chairperson of the Task Force. For 21every meeting after the initial meeting, the Task Force shall 22meet at the call of the chairperson.23    (e) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide 24administrative support to the Task Force.25    (f) The Task Force may allow testimony from the public 26regarding the impact of federal cuts on veterans.  SB3682- 3 -LRB104 20152 KTG 33603 b1    (g) All findings and recommendations made by the Task 2Force must be reported to the Governor and the General 3Assembly by December 15, 2027.4    (h) The Task Force is dissolved, and this Section is 5repealed, on January 31, 2028. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.